Tennessee, session 114, HB0078.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-11-154, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(e) Venue for prosecution under this section is the county in which the conduct
constituting the violation of a condition of release occurred.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0078
000873
- 1 -